Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-424
Nursing facility, defined.

Nursing facility means a facility where medical care, nursing care, rehabilitation, or related services and associated treatment are provided for a period of more than twenty-four consecutive hours to persons residing at such facility who are ill, injured, or disabled.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 24.